da: Udløsningsmekanisme for klampe: Nem udløsning; Fast / zero float; Udløsning i flere retninger; Multi-udløsning; Enkelt udløsning; Andet
hr-HR: Mehanizam za otpuštanje krampona: Jednostavno otpuštanje; Fiksno / nulti pomak; Višesmjerno otpuštanje; Višestruko otpuštanje; Jednostruko otpuštanje; Ostalo
nl: Ontgrendelingsmechanisme schoenplaatje: Eenvoudige release; Vast/zero float; Multi-directionele release; Multi-release; Single release; Overig
nb: Løsnemekanisme for klosser: Enkel utløser; Fast / null flyt; Flerveisutløser; Multiutløser; Enkelutløser; Annet
el: Μηχανισμός απελευθέρωσης καρφιού: Εύκολη απελευθέρωση; Σταθερό/μηδενική ελευθερία κίνησης; Απελευθέρωση πολλαπλών κατευθύνσεων; Πολλαπλή απελευθέρωση; Απλή απελευθέρωση; Άλλο
en: Cleat release mechanism: Easy release; Fixed/zero float; Multi-directional release; Multi-release; Single release; Other
zh-CN: 锁片脱离装置: 轻松释放; 固定/零浮动; 多向释放; 多重释放; 单向释放; 其他
ja: クリートリリースメカニズム: イージーリリース; 固定/ゼロフロート; 多方向リリース; マルチリリース; シングルリリース; その他
lt-LT: Spaustuko atleidimo mechanizmas: Lengvas atleidimas; Fiksuotas / nulinis judėjimas; Daugiakryptis atleidimas; Kelių krypčių atleidimas; Vienkryptis atleidimas; Kita
bg-BG: Механизъм за освобождаване на шпайкове: Лесно освобождаване; Фиксиран/нулев луфт; Многопосочно освобождаване; Многократно освобождаване; Еднократно освобождаване; Други
th: กลไกการปลดคลีท: ปลดง่าย; ติดตั้งแบบตายตัว/ระยะหลวมเป็นศูนย์; ปลดได้หลายทิศทาง; ปลดหลายจุด; ปลดจุดเดียว; อื่นๆ
sv: Mekanism för att ta av broddarna: Enkel utlösning; Fast/noll float; Flerriktad utlösning; Flervägsutlösning; Envägsutlösning; Övrigt
tr: Kilit açma mekanizması: Kolay serbest bırakma; Sabit/sıfır hareket payı; Çok yönlü serbest bırakma; Çoklu serbest bırakma; Tekli serbest bırakma; Diğer
fr: Mécanisme de déverrouillage des crampons: Déclenchement facile; Fixe / liberté angulaire nulle; Déclenchement multidirectionnel; Déclenchement multiple; Déclenchement simple; Autre
pt-PT: Mecanismo de libertação da travessa: Desengate fácil; Fixo/sem flutuação; Desengate multidirecional; Desengate múltiplo; Desengate único; Outro
it: Meccanismo di sgancio del tacchetto: Sgancio facilitato; Fisso/senza gioco; Sgancio multidirezionale; Sgancio multiplo; Sgancio singolo; Altro
hu: Stopli kioldó mechanizmus: Könnyített kioldás; Fix / holtjáték nélküli; Többirányú kioldás; Többszörös kioldás; Egyirányú kioldás; Egyéb
ko: 클릿 배출 메커니즘: 간편 분리; 고정/제로 플로트; 다방향 분리; 다중 분리; 단일 분리; 기타
es: Mecanismo de liberación de la cala: Liberación fácil; Fija/sin flotación; Liberación multidireccional; Liberación múltiple; Liberación simple; Otro
cs: Mechanismus uvolnění nášlapu: Snadné uvolnění; Pevné / nulová vůle; Vícesměrné uvolnění; Vícenásobné uvolnění; Jednoduché uvolnění; Jiné
vi: Cơ chế mở/tháo cá giày: Dễ tháo; Cố định/không có độ rơ; Tháo đa hướng; Tháo nhiều hướng; Tháo một hướng; Khác
sl-SI: Mehanizem za sprostitev kolesarskih čevljev: Enostavno odpenjanje; Fiksno/ničelna zračnost; Odpenjanje v več smereh; Večsmerno odpenjanje; Enosmerno odpenjanje; Drugo
de: Freigabemechanismus für Stollen: Leichtes Auslösen; Fixiert/Zero Float; Multidirektionales Auslösen; Multi-Release; Single-Release; Andere
ru: Механизм освобождения шипа: Легкое отстегивание; Фиксированные / нулевой свободный ход; Многонаправленное отстегивание; Многопозиционное отстегивание; Однонаправленное отстегивание; Другое
fi: Klossin vapautusmekanismi: Helppo irrotus; Kiinteä / ei välystä; Monisuuntainen irrotus; Monisuuntainen; Yksisuuntainen irrotus; Muu
pl: Mechanizm zwalniania kołków: Łatwe wypinanie; Sztywne / zerowy luz roboczy; Wypinanie wielokierunkowe; Wypinanie wielokierunkowe; Wypinanie jednokierunkowe; Inny
pt-BR: Mecanismo de liberação da presilha/trava: Liberação fácil; Fixo/flutuação zero; Liberação multidirecional; Liberação múltipla; Liberação única; Outros
zh-TW: 卡踏扣片釋放機制: 簡易釋放; 固定/零浮動; 多向釋放; 多重釋放; 單向釋放; 其他
sk-SK: Mechanizmus uvoľnenia zarážky: Jednoduché uvoľnenie; Pevné/nulová vôľa; Viacsmerové uvoľnenie; Viacnásobné uvoľnenie; Jednosmerné uvoľnenie; Iné
ro-RO: Mecanismul de eliberare a cramponului: Eliberare ușoară; Fix / zero float (fără joc); Eliberare multidirecțională; Eliberare multiplă; Eliberare unică; Altele